Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2105
Board, defined.

Board means the Board of Mental Health Practice.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 148;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,298;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 724.